Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.645.020

Transcript filed, certified.

Within twenty days of service of the notice of appeal, the school board, at its expense, or the school official, at such official's expense, shall file the complete transcript of the evidence and the papers and exhibits relating to the decision for which a complaint has been filed. Such filings shall be certified to be correct.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 41. Formerly RCW 28A.88.013.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.